Utah statutes.
11-13-308.   Effect of failure to comply.

The construction or operation of a project or of facilities providing additional project capacity may commence and proceed, notwithstanding the fact that all impact alleviation contracts or determination orders with respect to the project or facilities providing additional project capacity have not been entered into or made or that any appeal or review concerning the contract or determination has not been finally resolved. The failure of the project entity or other public agency to comply with the requirements of this chapter or with the terms of any alleviation contract or determination order or any amendment to them may not be grounds for enjoining the construction or operation of the project or facilities providing additional project capacity.

